California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other law, the emergency regulations adopted by the department may remain in effect for two years from adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 82, Sec. 5.   (AB 150)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6902.10.

(a) Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in Sections 17053.71 and 23628 govern the construction of this section.

(b) A qualified small business employer shall submit an application to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department for a tentative credit reservation amount for the small business hiring tax credit allowed to a qualified small business employer pursuant to Section 17053.71 or 23628, or both.

(c) The application shall include all of the following:

(1) The net increase in qualified employees, as determined pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17053.71 or
 subdivision (c) of Section 23628.

(2) (A) If the credit will be applied under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or both.

(B) If the qualified small business employer makes an irrevocable election to apply the credit against qualified sales and use taxes pursuant to Section 6902.9 in lieu of claiming the credit allowed by Section 17053.71 or 23628. An election under this subparagraph shall be allowed only for a qualified small business employer with an active seller’s permit or active certificate of registration-use tax. The election shall not be amended by the qualified small business employer or converted entity.

(3) If the applicant makes the election to apply the credit against qualified sales and use taxes as described in subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph 2, the qualified small business employer’s active seller’s permit number or active certificate of registration-use tax number.

(4) Valid state employer identification number of the qualified small business employer.

(5) Any other information and documentation as deemed necessary by the department.

(d) (1) Qualified small business employers shall submit, and the department shall accept, applications for tentative credit reservation amounts during the period beginning November 1, 2021, and ending November 30, 2021, or an earlier date determined by the department when the maximum cumulative total allocation limit in subdivision (e) is reached.

(2) Applications shall not be accepted by the department after November 30, 2021,
 or any other date determined by the department.

(3) The date and time an application is received shall be determined by the department. The determination of the department with respect to the date and time an application is received shall not be reviewed in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

(e) (1) The aggregate amount of credit that may be allocated pursuant to Sections 6902.9, 17053.71, and 23628 shall not exceed the cumulative total of seventy million dollars ($70,000,000) plus any amount of credit not allocated, and not required to be allocated, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 6902.8.

(2) The department shall allocate a tentative credit reservation to qualified small business employers on a first-come-first-served basis. For each application received, the total amount of
 credit available for allocation shall be reduced by an amount equal to the allocated tentative credit reservation amount.

(3) The tentative credit reservation amount per qualified small business employer shall be equal to the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A) minus the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(A) The amount, not exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), that is equal to the net increase in qualified employees, as reported on the application, multiplied by one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(B) If the qualified small business employer received a tentative credit reservation amount pursuant to Section 6902.8, either of the following:

(i) For a qualified small business employer that made an irrevocable
 election pursuant to Section 6902.8 to apply the credit against qualified sales and use taxes pursuant to Section 6902.7, the credit amounts allocated to the qualified small business employer pursuant to Sections 6902.7 and 6902.8.

(ii) For a qualified small business employer that elected to apply the credit under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or both, the tentative credit reservation amount received by the qualified small business employer pursuant to Section 6902.8.

(4) The department shall, within 30 days of receiving the application, notify the applicant of the tentative credit reservation amount. The amount allocated shall not constitute a determination by the department with respect to any of the requirements of this section or eligibility for the credit authorized by Section 6902.9, 17053.71, or 23628.

(5) The department shall periodically provide on its website the aggregate allocated tentative credit reservation amount under Sections 6902.9, 17053.71, and 23628 and the remaining credit amount available for allocation.

(6) The department may revise, on or before March 30, 2022, a qualified small business employer’s election to apply a credit against qualified sales and use taxes and instead apply the credit to taxes administered pursuant to Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or both, if the qualified small business employer’s seller’s permit or certificate of registration-use tax has been suspended, revoked, canceled, or closed.

(7) (A) The department shall cancel or reduce a qualified small business employer’s tentative credit reservation amount
 if the qualified small business employer fails to provide application information or documentation required by subdivision (c) to the department within 15 calendar days after the department requests the information.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the department may reduce a qualified small business employer’s tentative credit reservation amount for clerical errors or upon request by the applicant.

(8) (A) Tentative credit reservation amounts that become available on and after December 1, 2021, and before April 1, 2022, shall be made available to qualified small business employers and converted entities that applied for a tentative credit reservation amount pursuant to subdivision (a) but did not receive a tentative credit reservation amount because the aggregate amount of tentative credit reservations applied for pursuant to Sections 6902.9, 17053.71,
 and 23628 exceeded the cumulative total described in paragraph (1).

(B) Tentative credit reservation amounts made available pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be made available to qualified small business employers and converted entities on a first-come-first-served basis based on the order in which the application was received.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 7056, the department shall provide the Franchise Tax Board, in the form and manner agreed upon by the department and the Franchise Tax Board, any and all information provided by each applicant pursuant to subdivision (c) and any other information deemed necessary by the department and the Franchise Tax Board to administer and enforce this section and Sections 17053.71 and 23268.

(g) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce emergency regulations as necessary
 to implement, administer, and enforce its duties under this section. Any emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other law, the emergency regulations adopted by the department may remain in effect for two years from adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 82, Sec. 6.   (AB 150)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6903.

(a) No credit or refund of any amount paid pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) shall be allowed to any person on the ground that the storage, use, or other consumption of the property is exempted under Section 6401 unless the person establishes to the satisfaction of the board that his or her vendor has paid the sales tax to the state with respect to the sale of the property.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amount paid pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201)” does not include any payment or payments made pursuant to a determination
 made by the board under Articles 2 (commencing with Section 6481) and 3 (commencing with Section 6511) of Chapter 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 768, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6904.

(a) Every claim shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the claim is founded.

(b) A claim filed for or on behalf of a class of taxpayers shall do all of the following:

(1) Be accompanied by written authorization from each taxpayer sought to be included in the class.

(2) Be signed by each taxpayer or taxpayer’s authorized representative.

(3) State
 the specific grounds on which the claim is founded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 38, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6905.

Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this article constitutes a waiver of any demand against the State on account of overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6906.

Within 30 days after disallowing any claim in whole or in part the board shall serve notice of its action on the claimant in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6907.

Interest shall be paid upon any overpayment of any amount of tax at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the first day of the calendar month following the month during which the overpayment was made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the person making the overpayment with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid: 

(a) In the case of a refund, to the last day of the calendar month following the date
 upon which the person making the overpayment, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is the earlier. 

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 7.4.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6908.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

6909.

(a) The Controller shall transfer the amount of six hundred sixty-five million two hundred sixty-one thousand dollars ($665,261,000) from the General Fund to the Smog Impact Fee Refund Account, which is hereby created in the Special Deposit Fund.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the Smog Impact Fee Refund Account in the Special Deposit Fund are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Department of Motor
 Vehicles for the purpose of making refunds to persons who paid the smog impact fee formerly required by Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 6261) upon registering a vehicle in California. Each refund shall also include the amount of any penalties incurred by the payer with respect to the fee, and shall also include interest as specified in Sections 1673.2 and 1673.4 of the Vehicle Code. In addition, the appropriate level of court costs, fees, and expenses in the settlement of the case of Jordan v. Department of Motor Vehicles (1999) 75 Cal.App.4th 449, shall be determined through binding arbitration, and all of those fees, costs, or expenses shall be paid with funds from the account.

(c) The amount of any refund made under Section 1673.2 or Section 1673.4 of the Vehicle Code that is returned to the Department of Motor Vehicles because the recipient’s mailing address as shown by the records of the department is incorrect shall be retained in
 the Smog Impact Fee Refund Account in the Special Deposit Fund until either of the following occurs:

(1) The department is able to ascertain the correct address of the recipient, at which time the refund shall be mailed to that address.

(2) The date upon which those funds are transferred from the Smog Impact Fee Refund Account in the Special Deposit Fund back to the General Fund.

(d) Any unencumbered balance remaining in the account on or after June 30, 2004, shall revert to the General Fund.

(e) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the amount appropriated under subdivision (b) is a refund of taxes, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 8 of Article XIII of the Constitution, and, as a result, is not included within the “appropriations
 subject to limitation” of the state, as defined in that subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 32, Sec. 5.   Effective June 8, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Refund [6931. - 6937.]

6931.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this State or against any officer of the State to prevent or enjoin the collection under this part of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6932.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally determined or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6901).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 191.)
-------------------------------------------

6933.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6901), the claimant may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in any city or city and county of this state in which the Attorney General has an office for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

Failure to bring action within the time specified constitutes a waiver of any demand against the state on account of alleged
 overpayments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

6934.

If the board fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board of its action on the claim, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6935.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any sales or use tax or amount of use tax due and payable from the plaintiff. The balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 926.)
-------------------------------------------

6936.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established for overpayments pursuant to Section 6591.5 upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 7.6.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6937.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the person paying the amount or by any person other than the person who paid the amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [6961. - 6964.]

6961.

(a) The Controller may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering any
 erroneous refunds or credits, the board, in its discretion, may issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 6536) of Chapter 5. Except in the case of fraud, the determination shall be made within three years from the last day of the month following the quarterly period in which the board made its certification to the Controller that the amount collected was in excess of the amount legally due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6962.

The action shall be tried in the County of Sacramento unless the court with the consent of the Attorney General orders a change of place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6963.

The Attorney General shall prosecute the action, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials, and appeals are applicable to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6964.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the department finds that neither the person liable for payment of tax nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 6961, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the department serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section is operative for any action for recovery under Section 6961 on or after July 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 16.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cancellations [6981. - 6981.]

6981.

If any amount has been illegally determined either by the person filing the return or by the department, the department shall set forth that fact in its records, certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 9.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Administration [7051. - 7099.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [7051. - 7060.]

7051.

The board shall enforce the provisions of this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part. The board may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.1.

The board may adopt rules and regulations which provide for the issuance of a permit to a person who holds a valid seller’s permit which allows the purchase of tangible personal property without payment by the retailer of the tax imposed under this part and any reimbursement of the sales tax to the retailer by that person, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) That person agrees to report and pay the retailer’s tax liability directly to the board.

(b) The board determines that such a direct payment permit will
 facilitate the collection of the tax imposed under this part.

(c) The board determines that the issuance of a direct payment permit is to the mutual convenience of the board, the person to whom the direct payment permit is issued, and the retailers whose tax liability will be reported and paid by that person.

(d) The board determines that the issuance of a direct payment permit will not result in a tax loss either in total or on a cash flow basis. To ensure against a potential cash flow loss, the board may accelerate by not more than 10 days the prepayment due dates of a person.

(e) Any person who is issued a direct payment permit shall include with each tax return required to be filed under this part a schedule upon which all local sales and use tax, and any applicable district transactions and use tax, reported on
 the return as provided in subdivision (a) is allocated to the cities, counties, city and county, redevelopment agencies, and districts to which the tax would have been allocated if it had been reported and paid by the retailers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1343, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.2.

(a) If a holder of a direct payment permit issued by the board pursuant to Section 7051.1 gives an exemption certificate to a retailer for the purpose of paying that retailer’s tax liability to the board, and fails or refuses to pay that retailer’s tax liability to the board on a timely basis, then in addition to that retailer’s tax liability, the direct payment permitholder shall be subject to the same penalty provisions that would apply if that permit holder was the retailer.

(b) If a holder of a direct payment permit issued by the board pursuant to Section 7051.1
 does not properly allocate a retailer’s local sales and use tax liability, or that retailer’s district transactions and use tax liability, if applicable, to the cities, counties, city and county, redevelopment agencies, and districts to which those taxes would have been allocated if properly reported by that retailer, then the direct payment permitholder shall be liable to the state for a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of that retailer’s tax liability not properly allocated by the direct payment permitholder for improper allocation due to negligence or intentional disregard of the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1343, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.3.

(a) “Use tax direct payment permit” means a permit issued by the board that allows a taxpayer to self-assess and pay state and local use tax under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and if otherwise applicable, Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), and Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7280) directly to the board.

(b) Every person seeking to pay use taxes directly to the board shall file an application for a use tax direct
 payment permit. An application for a use tax direct payment permit shall be made upon a form prescribed by the board and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of the place or places of business where the applicant intends to make direct payment of use tax, and any other information that the board may require. An applicant for a use tax direct payment permit may register as a place to make direct payment of use tax, any of the places of business in this state that the applicant expects to be a place of first use for purchases subject to use tax, in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (d). The application shall be signed by the owner, if a natural person; in the case of an association or partnership, by a member or partner; and in the case of a corporation, by an executive officer or some person specifically authorized by the corporation to sign the application.

(c) Pursuant to an application, a use tax direct payment permit shall be issued to any person who meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The applicant agrees to self-assess and pay directly to the board any use tax liability incurred under this section.

(2) The applicant certifies to the board either of the following:

(A) The applicant is the purchaser for its own use or is the lessee of tangible personal property at a cost of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more in the aggregate, during the calendar year immediately preceding the application for the permit.

(B) The applicant is a county, city, city and county, or redevelopment agency.

(d) Any person who holds
 a valid use tax direct payment permit shall self-assess and pay directly to the board use taxes due under this part, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and if otherwise applicable, Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), and Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7280) for all purchases subject to use tax for which a use tax direct payment exemption certificate was issued, and shall report on the tax return required to be filed by Section 6452, the amount of local use tax applicable to each county, city, city and county, or redevelopment agency in which the first “use,” as defined in Section 6009, occurs.

(e) The board shall allow any holder of a use tax direct payment permit to issue a use tax direct payment certificate to any registered retailer or seller subject to all of the following:

(1) The use tax direct payment certificate shall be in a form prescribed by the board, and
 shall be signed by, and bear the name, address, and permit number of, the holder of the use tax direct payment permit.

(2) Once a use tax direct payment certificate has been issued by a holder of a use tax direct payment permit, it shall remain effective until revised or withdrawn by the holder of the permit or until the retailer or seller has received actual notice that the permit has been revoked by the board.

(3) A use tax direct payment certificate relieves a person selling property from the duty of collecting use tax only if taken in good faith from a person who holds a use tax direct payment permit. A purchaser who issues a use tax direct payment certificate that is accepted in good faith by a seller or retailer of tangible personal property shall be the sole person liable for any sales tax and related interest and penalties with respect to any transaction that is
 subsequently determined by the board to be subject to sales tax and not use tax.

(4) Any person who holds a use tax direct payment permit and gives a use tax direct payment certificate to a seller or retailer shall, in addition to any applicable use tax liabilities, be subject to the same penalty provisions that apply to a seller or retailer.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the board administer this part in a manner which assures that local use tax be received by the county, city, city and county, or redevelopment agency where the first use occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 15, Sec. 1.   Effective April 7, 1998.   Superseded January 1, 2027; see amendment by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.3.

(a) “Use tax direct payment permit” means a permit issued by the department that allows a taxpayer to self-assess and pay state and local use tax under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and if otherwise applicable, Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), and Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7280) directly to the department.

(b) (1) (A) Every person seeking to pay use taxes directly to the department shall file an application for a use tax direct payment permit. An application for a use tax direct payment permit shall be made upon a form prescribed by the department and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of the place or places of business where the applicant intends to make direct payment of use tax, and any other information that the department may require.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), an applicant for a use tax direct payment permit may register as a place to make direct payment of use tax any of the places of business in this state that the applicant expects to
 be a place of first use for purchases subject to use tax in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (e).

(ii) An applicant for a use tax direct payment permit who is required to pay use tax directly to the department pursuant to Section 6052 or Section 6201.55 shall register as a place to make direct payment of use tax any of the places of business in this state that the applicant expects to be a place of first use for purchases of digital products transferred electronically or accessed remotely that are subject to use tax in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (e).

(2) The application described in paragraph (1) shall be signed pursuant to the
 following:

(A) If the owner of the taxpayer is a natural person, the owner shall sign the application.

(B) If the taxpayer is an association or partnership, a member or partner shall sign the application.

(C) If the taxpayer is a corporation, an executive officer or a person specifically authorized by the corporation shall sign the application.

(c) Pursuant to an application, a use tax direct payment permit
 shall be issued to any person who meets both of the following conditions:

(1) The applicant agrees to self-assess and pay directly to the department any use tax liability incurred under this section.

(2) The applicant certifies to the department either of the following:

(A) The applicant is the purchaser for its own use or is the lessee of tangible personal property at a cost of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more in the aggregate, during the calendar year immediately preceding the application for the permit.

(B) The applicant is a county, city, or city and county.

(d) A use tax direct payment permit shall be issued to any person required to pay use tax directly to the department on purchases of digital products transferred electronically or accessed remotely pursuant to Section 6052 or 6201.55 for a period of 12 months.

(e) (1) Any person who holds a valid use tax direct payment permit shall self-assess and pay directly to the department use taxes due under this part, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and if otherwise applicable, Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), and Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7280) for all purchases subject to use tax for which a use tax direct payment exemption certificate was issued, and shall report on the tax return required to be filed by Section 6452, the amount of local use tax applicable to each county, city, or city and county in which the first “use,” as defined in Section 6009, occurs.

(2) A person required to pay use tax directly to the department on purchases of digital products pursuant to Section 6052 or 6201.55 shall issue an exemption certificate to a retailer of digital products transferred electronically or accessed remotely.

(f) The department shall allow any holder of a use tax direct payment permit to issue a use tax direct payment certificate to any registered retailer or seller subject to all of the following:

(1) The use tax direct payment certificate shall be in a form prescribed by the department and shall be signed by, and bear the name, address, and permit number of, the holder of the use tax direct payment permit.

(2) Once a use tax direct payment certificate has been issued by a holder of a use tax direct payment permit, it shall remain effective until revised or withdrawn by the holder of the permit or until the retailer or seller has received actual notice that the permit has been revoked by the department.

(3) A use tax direct payment certificate relieves a person selling property from the duty of collecting use tax only if taken in good faith from a person who holds a use tax direct payment permit. A purchaser who issues a use tax direct payment certificate that is accepted in good faith by a seller or retailer of tangible personal property shall be the sole person liable for any sales tax and related interest and penalties with respect to any transaction that is subsequently determined by the department to be subject to sales tax and not use tax.

(4) Any person who holds a use tax direct payment permit and gives a use tax direct payment certificate to a seller or retailer shall, in addition to any applicable use tax liabilities, be subject to the same penalty provisions that apply to a seller or retailer.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department administer this part in a manner that assures that local use tax will be received by the county, city, or city and county where the first use occurs.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 19.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.5.

The board shall prescribe rules and regulations respecting retail grocers who sell both taxable items and exempt food items to provide one or more methods whereby they may report their sales tax liabilities in as simplified a manner as is consistent with law. Such rules and regulations shall be applied equally to all grocers who report their sales tax liabilities thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1351.)
-------------------------------------------

7052.

The board may employ accountants, auditors, investigators, assistants, and clerks necessary for the efficient administration of this part and may designate representatives to conduct hearings, prescribe regulations, or perform any other duties imposed by this part or other laws of this State upon the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7053.

Every seller, every retailer as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6015, and every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming in this State tangible personal property purchased from a retailer shall keep such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers in such form as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7054.

The board or any person authorized in writing by it may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any person selling tangible personal property and any person liable for the use tax and may investigate the character of the business of the person in order to verify the accuracy of any return made, or, if no return is made by the person, to ascertain and determine the amount required to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7055.

In administration of the use tax the board may require the filing of reports by any person or class of persons having in his or their possession or custody information relating to sales of tangible personal property the storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to the tax. The reports shall be filed when the board requires and shall set forth the names and addresses of purchasers of the tangible personal property, the sales price of the property, the date of sale, and such other information as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7056.

(a) (1) Excepting the information set forth on permits issued under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6066) of Chapter 2, the information set forth on certificates of registration issued pursuant to Section 6226, and the terms of any settlement made pursuant to Section 19442 (as amended by Chapter 138 of the Statutes of 1994), it is unlawful for the board, any person having an administrative duty under this part or any person who obtains access to information contained in, or derived from, sales or transactions and
 use tax records of the board pursuant to subdivision (b), to make known in any manner whatever the business affairs, operations, or any other information pertaining to any retailer or any other person required to report to the board or pay a tax pursuant to this part, or the amount or source of income, profits, losses, expenditures, or any particular thereof, set forth or disclosed in any return, or to permit any return or copy thereof or any book containing any abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person.

(2) It is also unlawful for any person, other than an officer or employee of a county, city and county, city, or district, who obtains access to information contained in, or derived from, sales or transactions and use tax records of the board pursuant to subdivision (b), to retain that information after that person’s contract with the county, city and county, city, or district has expired.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the Governor may, by general or special order, authorize examination by other state officers, by tax officers of another state, by the federal government, if a reciprocal arrangement exists, by the tax officials of Mexico, if a reciprocal agreement exists, or by any other person of the records maintained by the board under this part. The information so obtained pursuant to the order of the Governor shall not be made public except to the extent and in the manner that the order may authorize that it be made public.
